Massachusetts, session 194th, H5248.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, John G. 
LeLacheur, the chief of the city of Beverly police department, may be appointed and may 
continue to serve in such position until he reaches 70 years of age, the date of his retirement or 
the date he is relieved of his duties by the mayor of the city of Beverly, whichever occurs first; 
provided, however, that he is mentally and physically capable of performing the duties of the 
position. The city of Beverly may require, at its own expense, that John G. LeLacheur be 
examined by an impartial physician designated by the city to determine his mental and physical 
capability. No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of John G. 
LeLacheur pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service subsequent to reaching the 
age of 65 years old and upon retirement John G. LeLacheur shall receive a superannuation 

of 2 11 retirement allowance equal to that which he would have been entitled had he retired upon 
reaching the age of 65 years old. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.